Washington statutes.
RCW 3.38.080

Separate electoral districts—Definition.

In any county in which separate electoral districts have been established pursuant to RCW 3.38.070, the term "district" also means "electoral district" for purposes of RCW 3.38.022, 3.38.050, and 3.38.060.

[ 1990 c 257 s 2.]